New York, session 2025-2026, S7311.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 105 of the public officers law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, consideration of 4 matters relating to the appointment of a member or officer of a public 5 body to fill a vacancy in such public body caused by reason of the 6 death, resignation, removal from office, or refusal to serve, of any 7 elected member or officer of such public body, including interviews of 8 applicants for appointment to fill such vacancy, and any discussions or 9 deliberations regarding any such appointment, shall be conducted in a 10 meeting open to the public and shall not be conducted in an executive 11 session. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02611-01-5